trunk/apertium-eo-es/apertium-eo-es.eo.dix
<pardef n="/igi__vbtr">
  <e>       <p><l>igi</l>       <r>igi<s n="vbtr"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igas</l>      <r>igi<s n="vbtr"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igis</l>      <r>igi<s n="vbtr"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igos</l>      <r>igi<s n="vbtr"/><s n="fti"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igus</l>      <r>igi<s n="vbtr"/><s n="cni"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>igus</l>      <r>igi<s n="vbtr"/><s n="fts"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>igita</l>    <r>igi<s n="vbtr"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igita</l>    <r>igi<s n="vbtr"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igitaj</l>   <r>igi<s n="vbtr"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igitan</l>   <r>igi<s n="vbtr"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igitajn</l>  <r>igi<s n="vbtr"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>igita</l>    <r>igi<s n="vbtr"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>igitan</l>   <r>igi<s n="vbtr"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igata</l>    <r>igi<s n="vbtr"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igataj</l>   <r>igi<s n="vbtr"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igatan</l>   <r>igi<s n="vbtr"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igatajn</l>  <r>igi<s n="vbtr"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>igata</l>    <r>igi<s n="vbtr"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>igatan</l>   <r>igi<s n="vbtr"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>igonta</l>    <r>igi<s n="vbtr"/><s n="pp2"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igonta</l>    <r>igi<s n="vbtr"/><s n="pp2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igontaj</l>   <r>igi<s n="vbtr"/><s n="pp2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iginta</l>    <r>igi<s n="vbtr"/><s n="pp3"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iginta</l>    <r>igi<s n="vbtr"/><s n="pp3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iginta</l>    <r>igi<s n="vbtr"/><s n="pp3"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igintaj</l>   <r>igi<s n="vbtr"/><s n="pp3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igante</l>    <r>igi<s n="vbtr"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iginte</l>    <r>igi<s n="vbtr"/><s n="gerpast"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igu</l>       <r>igi<s n="vbtr"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>igita</l>    <r>igi<s n="vbtr"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>igitaj</l>   <r>igi<s n="vbtr"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>igita</l>    <r>igi<s n="vbtr"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>igata</l>    <r>igi<s n="vbtr"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>igataj</l>   <r>igi<s n="vbtr"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>igata</l>    <r>igi<s n="vbtr"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>iĝi</l>       <r>igi<s n="vbtr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iĝas</l>      <r>igi<s n="vbtr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iĝis</l>      <r>igi<s n="vbtr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iĝos</l>      <r>igi<s n="vbtr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="fti"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iĝus</l>      <r>igi<s n="vbtr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="cni"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iĝus</l>      <r>igi<s n="vbtr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="fts"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iĝinta</l>    <r>igi<s n="vbtr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iĝinta</l>    <r>igi<s n="vbtr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iĝintaj</l>   <r>igi<s n="vbtr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iĝintan</l>   <r>igi<s n="vbtr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iĝintajn</l>  <r>igi<s n="vbtr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iĝinta</l>    <r>igi<s n="vbtr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iĝintan</l>   <r>igi<s n="vbtr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iĝanta</l>    <r>igi<s n="vbtr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iĝantaj</l>   <r>igi<s n="vbtr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iĝantan</l>   <r>igi<s n="vbtr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iĝantajn</l>  <r>igi<s n="vbtr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iĝanta</l>    <r>igi<s n="vbtr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iĝantan</l>   <r>igi<s n="vbtr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iĝonta</l>    <r>igi<s n="vbtr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="pp2"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iĝonta</l>    <r>igi<s n="vbtr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="pp2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iĝontaj</l>   <r>igi<s n="vbtr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="pp2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iĝinta</l>    <r>igi<s n="vbtr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="pp3"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iĝinta</l>    <r>igi<s n="vbtr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="pp3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iĝintaj</l>   <r>igi<s n="vbtr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="pp3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iĝante</l>    <r>igi<s n="vbtr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iĝinte</l>    <r>igi<s n="vbtr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="gerpast"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iĝu</l>       <r>igi<s n="vbtr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iĝinta</l>    <r>igi<s n="vbtr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iĝintaj</l>   <r>igi<s n="vbtr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iĝinta</l>    <r>igi<s n="vbtr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iĝanta</l>    <r>igi<s n="vbtr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iĝantaj</l>   <r>igi<s n="vbtr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iĝanta</l>    <r>igi<s n="vbtr"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>

<!-- se -igi verbo ricevas plian -ig, ni lasas ĝin same: geedzig-igi = geedzigi -->
  <e>       <p><l>igi</l>       <r>igi<s n="vbtr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igas</l>      <r>igi<s n="vbtr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igis</l>      <r>igi<s n="vbtr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igos</l>      <r>igi<s n="vbtr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="fti"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igus</l>      <r>igi<s n="vbtr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="cni"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>igus</l>      <r>igi<s n="vbtr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="fts"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>igita</l>    <r>igi<s n="vbtr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igita</l>    <r>igi<s n="vbtr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igitaj</l>   <r>igi<s n="vbtr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igitan</l>   <r>igi<s n="vbtr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igitajn</l>  <r>igi<s n="vbtr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>igita</l>    <r>igi<s n="vbtr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>igitan</l>   <r>igi<s n="vbtr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igata</l>    <r>igi<s n="vbtr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>

<e lm="alkaligi">            <i>alkal</i><par n="/igi__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="angorigi">            <i>angor</i><par n="/igi__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="atentigi">            <i>atent</i><par n="/igi__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="blankigi">            <i>blank</i><par n="/igi__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="ciferecigi">            <i>ciferec</i><par n="/igi__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="dekutimigi">            <i>dekutim</i><par n="/igi__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="diserigi">            <i>diser</i><par n="/igi__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="disvastigi">            <i>disvast</i><par n="/igi__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="ebligi">            <i>ebl</i><par n="/igi__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="eksproprietigi">            <i>ekspropriet</i><par n="/igi__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="elektrigi">            <i>elektr</i><par n="/igi__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="eloficigi">            <i>elofic</i><par n="/igi__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="elterigi">            <i>elter</i><par n="/igi__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="enfakigi">            <i>enfak</i><par n="/igi__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="enkarnigi">            <i>enkarn</i><par n="/igi__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="enoficigi">            <i>enofic</i><par n="/igi__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="enterigi">            <i>enter</i><par n="/igi__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="evidentigi">            <i>evident</i><par n="/igi__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="firmigi">            <i>firm</i><par n="/igi__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="fortimigi">            <i>fortim</i><par n="/igi__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="gasigi">            <i>gas</i><par n="/igi__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="grajnigi">            <i>grajn</i><par n="/igi__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="homogenigi">            <i>homogen</i><par n="/igi__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="igi">            <i></i><par n="/igi__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="interkonformigi">            <i>interkonform</i><par n="/igi__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="kanaligi">            <i>kanal</i><par n="/igi__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="kolorigi">            <i>kolor</i><par n="/igi__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="kriminaligi">            <i>kriminal</i><par n="/igi__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="kunordigi">            <i>kunord</i><par n="/igi__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="lacigi">            <i>lac</i><par n="/igi__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="liberigi">            <i>liber</i><par n="/igi__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="malakrigi">            <i>malakr</i><par n="/igi__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="malklarigi">            <i>malklar</i><par n="/igi__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="malplenigi">            <i>malplen</i><par n="/igi__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="malriĉigi">            <i>malriĉ</i><par n="/igi__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="martirigi">            <i>martir</i><par n="/igi__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="misfamigi">            <i>misfam</i><par n="/igi__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="naciigi">            <i>naci</i><par n="/igi__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="neŭtrigi">            <i>neŭtr</i><par n="/igi__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="obeigi">            <i>obe</i><par n="/igi__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="ozonigi">            <i>ozon</i><par n="/igi__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="pasiigi">            <i>pasi</i><par n="/igi__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="personigi">            <i>person</i><par n="/igi__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="pligravigi">            <i>pligrav</i><par n="/igi__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="pluvalidigi">            <i>pluvalid</i><par n="/igi__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="prestiĝigi">            <i>prestiĝ</i><par n="/igi__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="realigi">            <i>real</i><par n="/igi__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="revalidigi">            <i>revalid</i><par n="/igi__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="sekularigi">            <i>sekular</i><par n="/igi__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="senkapabligi">            <i>senkapabl</i><par n="/igi__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="senreguligi">            <i>senregul</i><par n="/igi__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="skemigi">            <i>skem</i><par n="/igi__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="subtiligi">            <i>subtil</i><par n="/igi__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="unuigi">            <i>unu</i><par n="/igi__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="ĉirkaŭlimigi">            <i>ĉirkaŭlim</i><par n="/igi__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="demokratiigi">            <i>demokrati</i><par n="/igi__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="solidarigi">            <i>solidar</i><par n="/igi__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="disfamigi">            <i>disfam</i><par n="/igi__vbtr"/></e>
<e lm="indiĝenigi">            <i>indiĝen</i><par n="/igi__vbtr"/></e>
